Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,188
Alienation of affections; criminal conversation; actions barred.

No cause of action for (1) alienation of affections or (2) criminal conversation shall be allowed to commence after January 9, 1986.

Laws 1986, LB 877, § 1.

The tort of intentional infliction of emotional distress is unavailable when it is predicated on conduct which leads to the dissolution of marriage, as such actions are barred by statute. Speer v. Dealy, 242 Neb. 542, 495 N.W.2d 911 (1993).